Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1510.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Nondisclosure agreements; information; natural resources; prohibition Notwithstanding any other law, a city or town may not include any of the following information In a nondisclosure agreement with a private entity: 1. the private entity's Water, gas or electricity use. 2. the private entity's Air or water emissions. 3. the private entity's Waste generation, including hazardous waste generation. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-269.31, to read: START_STATUTE11-269.31. Nondisclosure agreements; information; natural resources; prohibition Notwithstanding any other law, a county may not include any of the following information In a nondisclosure agreement with a private entity: 1. the private entity's Water, gas or electricity use. 2. the private entity's Air or water emissions. 3. the private entity's Waste generation, including hazardous waste generation. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. Nondisclosure agreements; information; natural resources; prohibition Notwithstanding any other law, This state may not include any of the following information In a nondisclosure agreement with a private entity: 1. the private entity's Water, gas or electricity use. 2. the private entity's Air or water emissions. 3. the private entity's Waste generation, including hazardous waste generation. END_STATUTE